Utah statutes.
75-2a-112.   Decisions by guardian.

(1)  A court-appointed guardian shall comply with an adult's advance health care directive and may not revoke the adult's advance health care directive unless the court, for cause, expressly revokes the adult's directive.

(2)  A health care decision of an agent takes precedence over that of a guardian, in the absence of a court order to the contrary.

(3)  Except as provided in Subsections (1) and (2), a health care decision made by a guardian for the adult patient is effective without judicial approval.

(4)  A guardian is not subject to civil or criminal liability or to claims of unprofessional conduct for a surrogate health care decision made:

(a)  in good faith; and

(b)  in accordance with Section 75-2a-110.



Amended by Chapter 107, 2008 General Session

